Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

Tennessee Child Care Facilities Corporation [Repealed]

4-37-101. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-102. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-103. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-105. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-106. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-107. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-108. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-109. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-110. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.

4-37-111. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-112. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-113. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-114. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-115. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-116. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-117. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”

4-37-118. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§4-37-101 —4-37-118 (Acts 1989, ch. 420, §§ 1-18; 1992, ch. 825, §§ 1-10; 1994, ch. 708, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, § 52), concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 3 provided that: “Any funds remaining in the child care facilities account established by §4-37-110 shall revert to the general fund. All rights, duties, privileges and responsibilities of contracts entered into by the Tennessee child care facilities corporation shall be assumed by the department of human services.”